Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/et_affix.dat
SFX W N 83
SFX W   0                    i                    [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    it                   [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    isse                 [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    is                   [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    ist                  [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    ile                  [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    il                   [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    ilt                  [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    iks                  [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    ini                  [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    ina                  [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    ita                  [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    iga                  [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    itesse               [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    ites                 [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    itest                [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    itele                [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    itel                 [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    itelt                [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    iteks                [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    iteni                [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    itena                [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    iteta                [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    itega                [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    id                   [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    ite                  [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    eisse                [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    eis                  [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    eist                 [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    eile                 [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    eil                  [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    eilt                 [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    eiks                 [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    eini                 [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    eina                 [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    eita                 [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    eiga                 [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    eid                  [abdefghijklmnoprsšztuvü][adeiklnoprstuöü][bdfghklmnprsšžtv]
SFX W   0                    s                    [aeu]ma
SFX W   0                    st                   [aeu]ma
SFX W   0                    ks                   [aeu]ma
SFX W   0                    ta                   [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   sin                  [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   sid                  [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   s                    [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   sime                 [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   site                 [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   vat                  [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   v                    [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   da                   [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   des                  [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   nud                  [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   gu                   [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   gem                  [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   ge                   [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   nuksin               [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   nuksid               [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   nuks                 [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   nuksime              [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   nuksite              [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   n                    [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   d                    [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   b                    [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   me                   [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   te                   [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   vad                  [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   ksin                 [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   ksid                 [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   ks                   [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   ksime                [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   ksite                [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   tud                  [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   takse                [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   ta                   [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   ti                   [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   taks                 [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   tagu                 [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   tavat                [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   tama                 [aeu]ma
SFX W   ma                   tav                  [aeu]ma
SFX W   ama                  a                    ama
SFX W   ema                  e                    ema
SFX W   uma                  u                    uma
